Alabama, session 2026rs, SB234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. A retailer regulated under Title 28, Code of
Alabama 1975, that is found in violation of failing to verify
the age of a customer or selling a product to a customer under
21 years of age, shall use one of the following technologies
at the point of sale to verify that a customer purchasing an
age-restricted product is at least 21 years of age:
(1) A secure digital system that may be voluntarily
installed on a customer's mobile device which uses a minimal
set of data points from the customer's driver license; or
(2) A card swipe device that reads the magnetic strip
or barcode of a driver license or other state issued
identification card.
Section 2. Any retailer in the state that sells
age-restricted products may use either of the technologies
described in Section 1 to verify the age of its customers.
Section 3. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 2